src/fst/stems/subjunctions.lexc
!! # Adverbial conjunctions
!! The adverbial conjunctions join two unequal clauses or phrases together.
!! The traditional term for this is sub-ordinating conjunction, it is assumed
!! here for compatibility with other languages. Adverbial conjunctions are a
!! subset of particles, so they do not inflect at all.

LEXICON CS
!! The adverbial conjunctions are:
!! ellei, että, jahka, jollei, jos, joskin, jos kohta, jotta, koska, kun,
!!  kunhan, mikäli, vaikka, (kunnes). 
!!
!! Further reading: [VISK § 818](http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisalto.php?p=818)
!!€gt-norm: Adverbial conjunctions
!!€ että: että+CS
!!€ jotta: jotta+CS
!!€ koska: koska+CS
!!€ kun: kun+CS
!!€ jos: jos+CS
!!€ vaikka: vaikka+CS

ennen% kuin+CS:ennen% kuin              # ;
ennenkuin+CS+Err/Orth:ennenkuin          # ;
et+CS+Use/sub:et                        # ;
että+CS#ei+V:ett                     VERB_EI ;
että+CS:että                            # ;
jos+CS#ei+V:ell                      VERB_EI ;
jos+CS#ei+V:joll                     VERB_EI ;
jos+CS:jos                              # ;
joskaan+CS:joskaan                      # ;
joskin+CS:joskin                        # ;
josko+CS:josko                          # ;
jotta+CS#ei+V:jott                   VERB_EI ;
jotta+CS:jotta                          # ;
konsa+CS:konsa                          # ;
koska+CS:koska                          # ;
kun+CS:kun                              # ;
kunhan+CS:kunhan                        # ;
kunnes+CS:kunnes                        # ;
kunpa+CS:kunpa                          # ;
mikäli+CS:mikäli                        # ;
sillä+CS:sillä                          # ;
sitäpaitsi+CS:sitäpaitsi                # ;
sun+CS:sun                              # ;
vaan+CS:vaan                            # ;
vaikka+CS#ei+V:vaikk                 VERB_EI ;
vaikka+CS:vaikka                        # ;
vaikkakaan+CS:vaikkakaan                # ;
vaikkakin+CS:vaikkakin                  # ;
vaikkapa+CS:vaikkapa                    # ;

ettäkö:ettäkö  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
jahka:jahka  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
joko:joko  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
jospa:jospa  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
koskapa:koskapa  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
kuin:kuin  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
ku:ku  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
saatikka:saatikka  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
saati:saati  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
vaikk:vaikk  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;

jos+Pcle:jos                            # ;
josko+Pcle:josko                        # ;
jospa+Pcle:jospa                        # ;
jotta+Pcle:jotta                        # ;
koskapa+Pcle:koskapa                    # ;
ku+Pcle:ku                              # ;
kunhan+Pcle:kunhan                      # ;
kunpa+Pcle:kunpa                        # ;
mikäli+Pcle:mikäli                      # ;
vaikkapa+Pcle:vaikkapa                  # ;


!Previously have been just Pcle (lexicon SCONJ_ETTÄ was empty): splited into CS and Pcle separately, not included Pcle that are already in adv.lexc
!ettäkö+Pcle:ettäkö  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
!että+Pcle:että  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
!jahka+Pcle:jahka  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
!joko+Pcle:joko  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
!joskaan+Pcle:joskaan  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
!josko+Pcle:josko  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
!jospa+Pcle:jospa  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
!jos+Pcle:jos  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
!jotta+Pcle:jotta  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
!koskapa+Pcle:koskapa  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
!koska+Pcle:koska  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
!kuin+Pcle:kuin  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
!kunhan+Pcle:kunhan  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
!kunpa+Pcle:kunpa  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
!kun+Pcle:kun  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
!ku+Pcle:ku  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
!mikäli+Pcle:mikäli  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
!saatikka+Pcle:saatikka  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
!saati+Pcle:saati  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
!sillä+Pcle:sillä  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
!vaan+Pcle:vaan  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
!vaikkakin+Pcle:vaikkakin  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
!vaikkapa+Pcle:vaikkapa  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
!vaikka+Pcle:vaikka  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;
!vaikk+Pcle:vaikk  SCONJ_ETTÄ  ;


!ell#ei+CS:ellei                         # ;
!ell#eivät+CS:elleivät                   # ;
!ell#emme+CS:ellemme                     # ;
!ell#en+CS:ellen                         # ;
!ell#et+CS:ellet                         # ;
!ell#ette+CS:ellette                     # ;
!että#ei+CS:ettei                        # ;
!että#eikö+CS:etteikö                    # ;
!että#eivät+CS:etteivät                  # ;
!että#emme+CS:ettemme                    # ;
!että#en+CS:etten                        # ;
!että#et+CS:ettet                        # ;
!että#ette+CS:ettette                    # ;
!jos#ei+CS:jollei                        # ;
!jos#eivät+CS:jolleivät                  # ;
!jos#emme+CS:jollemme                    # ;
!jos#en+CS:jollen                        # ;
!jos#et+CS:jollet                        # ;
!jos#ette+CS:jollette                    # ;
!vaikka#ei+CS:vaikkei                    # ;
!vaikka#eivät+CS:vaikkeivät              # ;
!vaikka#emme+CS:vaikkemme                # ;
!vaikka#en+CS:vaikken                    # ;
!vaikka#et+CS:vaikket                    # ;
!vaikka#ette+CS:vaikkette                # ;

LEXICON SCONJ_ETTÄ

+CS:	# ;
